Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.305.135

Rule making—School district fiscal impact statement required—Exceptions.

(1) The state board of education must provide a school district fiscal impact statement prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction with the published notice of a rule-making hearing required under RCW 34.05.320 on rules proposed by the board. At the rule-making hearing, the board must also hear a presentation from the office of the superintendent of public instruction and take public testimony on the fiscal impact statement. A copy of the fiscal impact statement must be forwarded to the education committees of the legislature.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must solicit fiscal impact estimates from a representative sample of school districts across the state when preparing a fiscal impact statement.

(3) This section does not apply to the following rules:

(a) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;

(b) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, or rules of other Washington state agencies;

(c) Rules that adopt, amend, or repeal a procedure or practice related only to the operation of the state board of education and not to any external parties;

(d) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its effect; or

(e) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute.

[ 2012 c 210 s 1.]